District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.04

Contents of contract; notice to subcontractors.

(a)

All contracts and government assistance subject to this subchapter shall include the requirements under §§ 2-220.03, 2-220.06, 2-220.07, and 2-220.08.

(b)

Each recipient of a contract or government assistance shall notify each subcontractor subject to this subchapter of the requirements as provided under subsection (a) of this section. The notification shall be in writing.

History

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 104, 53 DCR 2602